Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licenses

§ 1091.
Eligibility for licensure.

Each applicant for licensure as a property inspector shall meet the following minimum requirements:

Be at least 18 years of age and have successfully completed high school or its equivalent.

Complete no less than 80 hours of education approved by the Director covering all of the following real property core components:

heating systems;

cooling systems;

plumbing systems;

electrical systems;

structural components;

foundations;

roof coverings;

exterior and interior components; and

site aspects as they affect the building.

Pass an examination required for licensure. The Director shall identify by rule an eligibility examination required for licensure that is an independent, nationally recognized proctored examination.

[Repealed.]

Proof of certification issued by an independent, nationally recognized organization that provides certification for property inspectors satisfies the eligibility requirements set forth in subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) of this section. The Director shall identify by rule acceptable organizations for certification. The Director shall issue a license to practice to any person who in addition to the requirements of subdivision (a)(1) of this section is certified by an acceptable organization identified by the Director.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2015, No. 38

, § 6, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1092.
License renewal.

A license shall be renewed every two years on a schedule determined by the Director upon application and payment of the required fee. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall result in suspension of all privileges granted to the licensee, beginning on the expiration date of the license.

A license that has lapsed may be renewed upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and the late renewal penalty.

The Director may adopt rules necessary for the protection of the public to assure the Director that an applicant whose license has lapsed or who has not worked for more than five years as a property inspector is professionally qualified for license renewal. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall be in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1093.
Applications.

Applications for licensure and license renewal shall be on forms provided by the Director. Each application shall contain a statement under oath showing the applicant’s education, experience, and other pertinent information and shall be accompanied by the required fee.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1094.
Licensure generally.

The Director shall issue a license or renew a license, upon payment of the fees required under this chapter, to an applicant or licensee who has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1095.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay those fees set forth in

3 V.S.A. § 125

.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.